District of Columbia statutes.
38-1853.04

General authority.

(a)

Opportunity Scholarships. —

(1)

In general. —

From funds appropriated under § 38-1853.14(a)(1), the Secretary shall award grants on a competitive basis to eligible entities with approved applications under § 38-1853.05 to carry out a program to provide eligible students with expanded school choice opportunities. The Secretary may award a single grant or multiple grants, depending on the quality of applications submitted and the priorities of this chapter.

(2)

Duration of grants. —

The Secretary may make grants under this subsection for a period of not more than 5 years.

(b)

D.C. Public Schools and Charter Schools. —

From funds appropriated under paragraphs (2) and (3) of § 38-1853.14(a), the Secretary shall provide funds to the Mayor of the District of Columbia, if the Mayor agrees to the requirements described in § 38-1853.11(a), for—

(1)

the District of Columbia public schools to improve public education in the District of Columbia; and

(2)

the District of Columbia public charter schools to improve and expand quality public charter schools in the District of Columbia.

Apr. 15, 2011, 125 Stat. 200, Pub. L. 112-10, Div. C, § 3004
This section is referenced in § 38-1853.05, § 38-1853.06, § 38-1853.07, § 38-1853.09, § 38-1853.10, and § 38-1853.12.